Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 1. Districts.
§ 69-27-31.
Election of three commissioners for each district.

Within thirty (30) days after the date of issuance by the Secretary of State of a certificate of organization of a soil and water conservation district, nominating petitions may be filed with the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee to nominate candidates for commissioners of such district. The committee shall have authority to extend the time within which nominating petitions may be filed. No such nominating petition shall be accepted by the committee unless it shall be subscribed by twenty-five (25) or more owners of lands lying within the boundaries of such district. Landowners may sign more than one such nominating petition to nominate more than one candidate for commissioner but in no event shall a landowner sign more than three (3) such nominating petitions. The committee is hereby authorized to enact and implement rules to provide that not more than one commissioner shall be a resident of any one county or supervisors district, unless there is no person qualified and willing to serve in another county or supervisors district. The committee shall give due notice of an election to be held for the election of three (3) commissioners for the district. The names of all nominees, on behalf of whom such nominating petitions have been filed within the time herein designated, shall appear, arranged in alphabetical order of the surnames, upon ballots, with a square before each name and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before any three (3) names to indicate the voter’s preference. All owners of lands lying within the district shall be eligible to vote in such election. Only such landowners shall be eligible to vote. The three (3) candidates who receive a majority of the votes cast in such an election shall be elected commissioners for such district. In the event any candidate fails to receive a majority, then the candidates receiving the largest number of votes shall run off in an election to be held two (2) weeks thereafter. The committee shall pay all the expenses of such elections, shall supervise conduct thereof, shall prescribe regulations governing the conduct of such election and the determination of the eligibility of voters therein, and shall publish the results of same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4945; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 6, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-33.
Appointment, qualifications, and tenure of commissioners.

The governing body of the district shall consist of five (5) commissioners, elected or appointed as provided hereinabove. The commissioners shall be persons who are landowners and/or operators within the geographical areas of the district qualified to perform the specialized skilled services which will be required of them in the performance of their duties hereunder, and able to attend all meetings.

The commissioners shall designate a chairman annually. The term of office of each commissioner shall be three (3) years, except that the commissioners who are first appointed shall be designated to serve for terms of one (1) and two (2) years, respectively, from the date of their appointment. A commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been elected or appointed and has qualified. Vacancies shall be filled by election or appointment as in the case of the election or appointment of other commissioners, but in the event the unexpired terms remaining of the offices vacated are less than one (1) year, said vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term by the other commissioners. The selection of successors for a full term shall be made in the same manner in which the original retiring commissioners shall, respectively, have been selected. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum and the concurrence of a majority in any matter within their duties shall be required for its determination. A commissioner and any deputy commissioner shall receive no compensation for their services, but they shall be entitled to expenses, including travelling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties.

The commissioners may utilize the services of the county agricultural agents and the facilities of the county agricultural agents’ offices insofar as practicable and feasible, and may, with the approval of the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission employ such other help as may be necessary. Employees hired pursuant to this section, upon agreement by the commissioners and the county board of supervisors, shall be considered as employees of the county or counties in which the district is located solely for the purpose of allowing such county or counties to include these employees in any group life and/or health insurance or workers’ compensation insurance program maintained by the county or counties for its employees and to include these employees in the county payroll system. Upon such agreement, the county or counties shall be responsible for the payment and withholding functions for the commissioners and shall provide the employees with all required tax documents. If more than one (1) county desires to include these employees in a group life and/or health insurance or workers’ compensation insurance program, the counties shall determine the program in which the employees shall be included and the amount of contributions that the other county or counties shall make to that program on behalf of the employees. Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean that these employees are to be considered as county employees for any purpose other than the purpose of including these employees in a county employee group life and/or health insurance or workers’ compensation insurance program and the county’s payroll system. The commissioners may call upon the Attorney General of the state for such legal services as they may require, or may use such other legal counsel as may be available. The commissioners may delegate to their chairman, to one or more commissioners, or to one or more agents, or employees, such powers and duties as they may deem proper, and may appoint such deputy commissioners as they deem appropriate, not to exceed one (1) deputy commissioner for each supervisor district in the soil and water conservation district, to assist the commissioners in the performance of their duties; however, deputy commissioners shall not be entitled to vote on any matter coming before the commissioners. The State Soil and Water Conservation Commission shall establish and administer qualification standards and establish term of office for deputy commissioners. The commissioners shall furnish to the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission, upon request, copies of such ordinances, rules, regulations, orders, contracts, forms and other documents as they shall adopt or employ, and such other information concerning their activities as it may require in the performance of its duties under this article.

The commissioners may provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees and officers who shall be entrusted with funds or property; shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all resolutions, regulations and orders issued or adopted; and shall provide for an annual audit of the accounts of receipts and disbursements if total annual receipts or expenditures exceeds Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00) and an annual financial statement if total annual receipts or expenditures is equal to or less than Sixty Thousand Dollars ($60,000.00).

The commissioners may invite the legislative body of any municipality or county located near the territory comprised within the district to designate a representative to advise and consult with the commissioners of the district on all questions of program and policy which may affect the property, water supply, or other interests of such municipality or county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4946; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1962, ch. 170; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 488, § 9; Laws, 1989, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 461, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 310, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997; Laws, 1999, ch. 413, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 69-27-35.
Powers of districts and commissioners.

A soil and water conservation district organized under the provisions of this article shall constitute a governmental subdivision of this state, and a public body, corporate and politic, exercising public powers, and such district and the commissioners thereof shall have the following powers, in addition to others granted in other sections of this article:

To conduct surveys, investigations and research relating to the character of soil erosion and the preventive and control measures needed, to publish results of such surveys, investigations or research, and to disseminate information concerning such preventive and control measures. However, in order to avoid duplication of research activities, no district shall initiate any research program except in cooperation with the government of this state or any of its agencies, or with the United States or any of its agencies.

To conduct demonstration projects within the district on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other lands within the district upon obtaining the consent of the owner of such lands or the necessary rights or interests in such lands, in order to demonstrate by example the means, methods, and measures by which water and soil resources may be conserved, and soil erosion in the form of soil washing may be prevented and controlled.

To carry out preventive and control measures within the district including, but not limited to, engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, changes in use of land, and the measures listed in subsection (c), Section 69-27-3, on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other lands within the district upon obtaining the consent of the owner of such lands.

To cooperate, or enter into agreements with, and within the limits of appropriations duly made available to it by law, to furnish financial or other aid to any agency, governmental or otherwise, or any owner or operator of lands within the district, in the carrying on of erosion control and prevention operations within the district, subject to such conditions as the commissioners may deem necessary to advance the purposes of this article.

To obtain options upon and to acquire by purchase, exchange, lease, gift, grant, bequest, or devise, any property, real or personal, or rights or interests therein, and all such property shall be exempt from state, county, or municipal taxation; to maintain, administer, and improve any properties acquired, to receive income from such properties and to expend such income in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this article; and to sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of any of its property or interests therein in furtherance of the purposes and the provisions of this article. Notwithstanding any provisions of general law to the contrary, no land or interest therein described under this subsection shall be acquired for recreational purposes by eminent domain proceedings after the effective date of this article.

To make available, on such terms as it shall prescribe, to landowners and operators within the district, agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer, seeds, and seedlings, and such other material or equipment, as will assist such landowners and operators to carry on operations upon their lands for the conservation of soil and water resources and for the prevention and control of soil erosion, and to purchase comprehensive insurance on such agricultural and engineering equipment.

To construct, improve, and maintain such structures as may be necessary or convenient for the performance of any of the operations authorized in this article, with the consent of two-thirds (2/3) of the landowners owning sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of all lands affected, whether the owners of such land live within such district or not.

To develop comprehensive plans for the conservation of soil and water resources and for the control and prevention of soil erosion within the district, and to bring such plans and information to the attention of owners and operators of lands within the district.

To acquire by purchase or lease, and to administer, any water and soil conservation, erosion-control or erosion-prevention project located within its boundaries undertaken by the United States or any of its agencies, or by this state or any of its agencies; to manage as agent of the United States or any of its agencies, or of this state or any of its agencies, any water and soil conservation, erosion-control or erosion-prevention project within its boundaries; to act as agent for the United States or any of its agencies, or for this state or any of its agencies, in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or administration of any soil and water conservation, erosion-control or erosion-prevention project within its boundaries; to accept donations, gifts and contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise, from the United States or any of its agencies, or from this state or any of its agencies, or from private sources, and to use or expend such monies, services, materials, or other contributions in carrying on its operations.

To assist individual landowners or operators and organized groups, associations, or other agencies or units of government to plan and establish recreational facilities for family use, income-producing purposes, or for community access.

To enter into contracts with the approval of the Governor with any agency of the federal or state government or its political subdivisions to accomplish the objectives of this article.

To collect cost-sharing funds, and to establish and implement procedures compatible with the purposes of this article for the necessary financing of water and soil conservation district activities, including the administration of any federal funds made available for the use of the district.

To receive and expend funds or monies or other assets from any state or federal agency or any other source, public or private, in furtherance of the purposes of this article.

To sue and be sued in the name of the district; to have a seal, which seal shall be judicially noticed; to have perpetual succession unless terminated as hereinafter provided; to make and execute contracts and other instruments, necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers; to make, and from time to time amend and repeal rules and regulations not inconsistent with this article, to carry into effect its purposes and powers.

As a condition to the extending of any benefits under this article to, or the performance of work upon, any lands not owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, the commissioners may require contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise to any operations conferring such benefits, and may require landowners and operators to enter into and perform such agreements or covenants as to the permanent use of such lands as will tend to prevent or control erosion thereon.

No provision with respect to the acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by other public bodies shall be applicable to a district organized hereunder unless the Legislature shall specifically so state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4947; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 8; Laws, 1972, ch. 437, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 309, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 69-27-37.
Adoption of land-use regulations.

The commissioners of any district shall have authority to formulate regulations governing the use of lands within the district in the interest of conserving water and soil and soil resources and preventing and controlling soil erosion subject to the approval of and acceptance by two-thirds (2/3) of the landowners owning at least sixty-six and two-thirds per cent(662/3) of the lands affected by such proposed regulations. Such regulations shall be compatible with state laws, particularly those related to the board of water commissioners.

The commissioners may conduct such public meetings and public hearings upon tentative regulations as may be necessary to assist them in this work. The commissioners shall not have authority to enact such water and land use regulations into law until after they shall have caused due notice to be given of their intention to conduct a referendum for submission of such regulations to the owners of lands lying within the boundaries of the district for their indication of approval or disapproval of such proposed regulations, and until after the commissioners have considered the result of such referendum. The proposed regulations shall be embodied in a proposed ordinance. Copies of such proposed ordinance shall be available for the inspection of all eligible voters during the period between publication of such notice and the date of the referendum. The notices of the referendum shall recite the contents of such proposed ordinance, or shall state where copies of such proposed ordinance may be examined. The question shall be submitted by ballots, upon which the words “for approval of proposed ordinance No._______________ , prescribing land and water use regulations for conservation of soil and water and prevention of erosion” and “against approval of proposed ordinance No._______________ , prescribing water and land use regulations for conservation of soil and water and prevention of erosion” shall appear, with a square before each proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before one or the other of said propositions as the voter may favor or oppose approval of such proposed ordinance. The commissioners shall supervise such referendum, shall prescribe appropriate regulations governing the conduct thereof, and shall publish the result thereof. All owners of land within the district shall be eligible to vote in such referendum. Only such landowners shall be eligible to vote. No informalities in the conduct of such referendum or in any matters relating thereto shall invalidate said referendum or the result thereof if notice thereof shall have been given substantially as herein provided and said referendum shall have been fairly conducted.

The commissioners shall not have authority to enact such proposed ordinance into law unless two-thirds (2/3) of the landowners owning at least sixty-six and two-thirds per cent(662/3%) of all lands affected by such proposed ordinance shall have voted in favor thereof. The approval of the proposed ordinance by two-thirds (2/3) of the landowners owning at least sixty-six and two-thirds per cent (662/3%) of the land affected by such ordinance shall not be deemed to require the commissioners to enact such proposed ordinance into law. Water and land use regulations prescribed in ordinances adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section by the commissioners of any district shall have the force and effect of law in the said district.

Any owners or operators of land within such district may at any time file a petition with the commissioners asking that any or all of the water and land use regulations prescribed in any ordinance adopted by the commissioners under the provisions of this section shall be amended, supplemented or repealed. Water and land use regulations prescribed in any ordinance adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section shall not be amended, supplemented, or repealed except in accordance with the procedure prescribed in this section for adoption of water and land use regulations. Referendums on adoption, amendment, supplementation, or repeal of water and land use regulations shall not be held more often than once in twelve (12) months.

The regulations to be adopted by the commissioners under the provisions of this section may include:

Provisions requiring the carrying out of necessary engineering operations, including the construction of terraces, terrace outlets, check dams, dikes, ponds, ditches, and other necessary structures.

Provisions requiring observance of particular methods of cultivation, including contour cultivating, contour furrowing, lister furrowing, sowing, planting, strip cropping, seeding, and planting of lands to water conserving and erosion-preventing plants, trees, and grasses, afforestation, and reforestation.

Specifications of cropping programs and tillage practices to be observed.

Provisions requiring the retirement from cultivation of highly erodible areas or of areas on which erosion may not be adequately controlled if cultivation is carried on.

Provisions for such other means, measures, operations, and programs as may assist conservation of water and soil resources and prevent or control soil erosion in the district having due regard to the legislative findings set forth in Section 69-27-3.

The regulations shall be uniform throughout the territory comprised within the district except that the commissioners may classify the lands within the district with reference to such factors as soil type, degree of slope, degree of erosion threatened or existing, cropping and tillage practices in use, and other relevant factors, and may provide regulations varying with the type or class of land affected, but uniform as to all lands within each class or type. Copies of water and land use regulations adopted under the provisions of this section shall be made available to all owners and operators of lands lying within the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4948; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 9, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-39.
Enforcement of land-use regulations.

The commissioners shall have authority to go upon any lands within the district to determine whether land-use regulations adopted under the provisions of Section 69-27-37 are being observed. The commissioners are further authorized to provide by ordinance that any landowner or operator who shall sustain damages from any violation of such regulations by any other landowner or operator may recover damages at law from such other landowner or operator for such violation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4949; Laws, 1938, ch. 253.

§ 69-27-41.
Performance of work under the regulations by the commissioners.

Where the commissioners of any district shall find that any of the provisions of land-use regulations prescribed in an ordinance adopted in accordance with the provisions of Section 69-27-37 are not being observed on particular lands, and that such violations are the proximate cause of damage to any other landowner within the district, then the commissioners may present to the chancery court of the county in which the lands of the defendant may lie a petition, duly verified, setting forth the adoption of the ordinance prescribing land-use regulations, the failure of the defendant landowner or operator or both to observe such regulations, and to perform particular work, operations or avoidance as required thereby and that such nonobservance tends to increase erosion on such lands and is interfering with the prevention or control of erosion on other lands within the district and is the proximate cause of damage to other landowners within the district, and praying the court to require the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances within a reasonable time and to order that if the defendant shall fail so to perform the commissioners may go on the land, perform the work or other operations or otherwise bring the condition of such lands into conformity with the requirements of such regulations and recover the costs and expenses thereof from the defendant. Upon the filing of such petition, process shall issue against the defendant returnable in the manner provided by law, and said cause shall be tried in the manner provided by law for the trial of civil actions. The defendant may demand a trial by jury and in such event, the jurors shall have the qualifications of jurors in eminent domain proceedings in the chancery court. If the decree of the court be against the defendant, the court may require the defendant to perform the work, operations, or avoidances, and may provide that upon the failure of the defendant to initiate such performance within the time specified in the order of the court, and to prosecute the same to completion with reasonable diligence, the commissioners may enter upon the lands involved and perform the work or operations or otherwise bring the condition of such lands into conformity with the requirements of the regulations and may recover the costs and expenses thereof, from the defendant. In no case, however, shall the commissioners enter upon such lands for such purpose until the court shall have found that the landowner or person in possession has not prosecuted such work as was ordered by the court with reasonable diligence. In all cases where the person in possession of lands who shall fail to perform such work, operations, or avoidances shall not be the owner, the owner of such lands shall be joined as party defendant.

The court shall retain jurisdiction of the case until after the work has been completed. Upon completion of such work pursuant to such order of the court, the commissioners may file a petition with the court, a copy of which shall be served upon the defendant in the case, in the manner provided by law for service of process, stating the costs and expenses sustained by them in the performance of the work and praying judgment therefor. The court shall have jurisdiction to enter, upon a hearing to be held not sooner than five days after service of such process, its decree for the amount of such costs and expenses together with the costs of suit, including a reasonable attorney’s fee to be fixed by the court. Such decree shall when entered upon the lis pendens docket of said court, constitute a lien on the lands of the defendant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4950; Laws, 1938, ch. 253.

§ 69-27-43.
Board of adjustment; members; expenses.

Where the commissioners of any district organized under the provisions of this article shall adopt an ordinance prescribing land-use regulations in accordance with the provisions of Section 69-27-37, they shall further provide by ordinance for the establishment of a board of adjustment. Such board of adjustment shall consist of three (3) members, each to be appointed for a term of three (3) years, except that the members first appointed shall be appointed for terms of one (1), two (2), and three (3) years, respectively. The members of each such board of adjustment shall be appointed by the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee, and shall be removable, upon notice and hearing, for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office, but for no other reason, such hearing to be conducted jointly by the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee and the commissioners of the district. Vacancies in the board of adjustment shall be filled in the same manner as original appointments, and shall be for the unexpired term of the member whose term becomes vacant. Members of the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee and the commissioners of the district shall be ineligible to appointment as members of the board of adjustment during their tenure of such other office. The members of the board of adjustment shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be entitled to expenses, including travelling expenses, necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties. The commissioners shall pay the necessary administrative and other expenses of operation incurred by the board, upon the certificate of the chairman of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4951; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-45.
Board of adjustment; procedure; meetings; records.

The board of adjustment shall adopt rules to govern its procedure, which rules shall be in accordance with the provisions of this article, and with the provisions of any ordinance adopted pursuant to Sections 69-27-43 through 69-27-49. The board shall designate a chairman from among its members, and may, from time to time, change such designation. Meetings of the board shall be held at the call of the chairman and at such other times as the board may determine. Any two (2) members of the board shall constitute a quorum. The chairman, or in his absence such other member of the board as he may designate to serve as acting chairman, may administer oaths and compel the attendance of witnesses. All meetings of the board shall be open to the public. The board shall keep a full and accurate record of all proceedings, of all documents filed with it, and of all orders entered, which shall be filed in the office of the board and shall be a public record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4951; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-47.
Board of adjustment; hearing on land use regulations.

Any landowner or operator may file a petition with the board of adjustment alleging that there are great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardships in the way of his carrying out upon his lands the strict letter of the land-use regulations prescribed by ordinance approved by the commissioners, and praying the board to authorize a variance from the terms of the land-use regulations in the application of such regulations to the lands owned or operated by the petitioner. Copies of such petition shall be served by the petitioner upon the chairman of the commissioners of the district within which his lands are located and upon the chairman of the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee. The board of adjustment shall fix a time for the hearing of the petition and cause due notice of such hearing to be given. The commissioners of the district and the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee shall have the right to appear and be heard at such hearing. Any owner or operator of lands lying within the district who shall object to the authorizing of the variance prayed for may intervene and become a party to the proceedings. Any party to the hearing before the board may appear in person, by agent, or by attorney. If, upon the facts presented at such hearing, the board shall determine that there are great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardship in the way of applying the strict letter of any of the land-use regulations upon the lands of the petitioner, it shall make and record such determination and shall make and record findings of fact as to the specific conditions which establish such great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardship. Upon the basis of such findings and determination, the board shall have power by order to authorize such variance from the terms of land-use regulations in their application to the lands of the petitioner, as will relieve such great practical difficulties or unnecessary hardship and will not be contrary to the public interest, and such that the spirit of the land-use regulations shall be observed, the public health, safety, and welfare secured, and substantial justice done.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4951; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-49.
Appeal from order of board of adjustment.

Any petitioner aggrieved by an order of the board granting or denying, in whole or in part, the relief sought, the commissioners of the district, or any intervening party, may obtain a review of such order in the chancery court of the county in which the lands of the petitioner may lie, by filing in such court a petition praying that the order of the board be modified or set aside and may demand a jury qualified in all respects as the jurors in eminent domain proceedings in the chancery court. A copy of such petition shall forthwith be served upon the parties to the hearing before the board and thereupon the party seeking review shall file in the court a transcript of the entire record in the proceedings, certified by the board, including the documents and testimony upon which the order complained of was entered, and the findings, determination, and order of the board. Upon such filing, the court shall cause notice thereof to be served upon the parties and shall have jurisdiction of the proceedings and of the questions determined or to be determined therein, and shall have power to grant such temporary relief as it deems just and proper, and to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying and enforcing as so modified, or setting aside in whole or in part, the order of the board. No contention that has not been urged before the board shall be considered by the court unless the failure or neglect to urge such contention shall be excused because of extraordinary circumstances. The findings of the board as to the facts, if supported by evidence, shall be conclusive. If any party shall apply to the court for leave to produce additional evidence and shall show to the satisfaction of the court that such evidence is material and that there were reasonable grounds for the failure to produce such evidence in the hearing before the board, the court may order such additional evidence to be taken before the board and to be made a part of the transcript. The board may modify the findings as to the facts or make new findings, taking into consideration the additional evidence so taken and filed, and it shall file such modified or new findings which, if supported by evidence, shall be conclusive, and shall file with the court its recommendations, if any, for the modification or setting aside of its original order. The jurisdiction of the court shall be exclusive and its judgment and decree shall be final, except that the same shall be subject to review in the same manner as are other judgments or decrees of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4951; Laws, 1938, ch. 253; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1969.

§ 69-27-51.
Cooperation between districts.

The commissioners of any two or more districts organized under the provisions of this article may cooperate with one another in the exercise of any or all powers conferred in this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4952; Laws, 1938, ch. 253.

§ 69-27-53.
State agencies to cooperate.

Agencies of this state which shall have jurisdiction over, or be charged with the administration of, any state-owned lands, and of any county, or other governmental subdivision of the state, which shall have jurisdiction over, or be charged with the administration of, any county-owned or other publicly owned lands, lying within the boundaries of any district organized hereunder, shall cooperate to the fullest extent with the commissioners of such districts in the effectuation of programs and operations undertaken by the commissioners under the provisions of this article. The commissioners of such districts shall be given free access to enter and perform work upon such publicly owned lands. The provisions of land-use regulations adopted pursuant to Section 69-27-37, shall have the force and effect of law over all such publicly owned lands, and shall be in all respects observed by the agencies administering such lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4953; Laws, 1938, ch. 253.

§ 69-27-55.
Adjustment of boundaries or withdrawal of lands from district; consolidation with another district; petition.

Any twenty-five (25) owners of land lying within the limits of a portion of a soil and water conservation district organized under the provisions of this article may petition the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee asking that the described area be withdrawn from the present district, or that the district be dissolved, and consolidated with another district or segment of another district, and that the area withdraw or the composite area be designated as an individual soil and water conservation district, with all the powers and responsibilities designated to soil and water conservation districts by law. Such petition shall set forth:

The proposed name of such district.

That there is a need for adjustment of boundaries or reorganization of territory, to provide for a separate soil and water conservation district to function in the territory described in the petition, in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare.

A description of the territory proposed to be included in the adjusted boundaries, or the territory to be withdrawn from an existing district, and the total territory to be included in the new district.

A request that the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee duly define the boundaries for such district; that one or more public hearings be held to determine the feasibility and propriety of such changes; and that the committee determine that such adjustments be made or such district created.

Where more than one petition is filed covering parts of the same territory, the State Soil and Water Conservation Committee may consolidate all or any such petitions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4954.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 246, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1969.